Colorado, session 2026A, HB1088.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 7-90-303, add (5) as
follows:
7-90-303. Filing, service, and copying fees - subpoenas.
(5) IF PAYMENT FOR A DOCUMENT SUBMITTED TO THE SECRETARY OF
STATE FOR FILING IS NOT SUCCESSFULLY PROCESSED, INCLUDING REVERSAL
OF THE ELECTRONIC PAYMENT, THE DOCUMENT HAS NOT BEEN
SUCCESSFULLY FILED, NOTWITHSTANDING THE TIME OR DATE INITIALLY
STAMPED ON THE DOCUMENT. THE SECRETARY OF STATE MAY EITHER:
(a) MARK THE DOCUMENT AS VOID AND ADJUST THE ENTITY'S
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

RESULTING STATUS; OR
(b) REMOVE THE DOCUMENT FROM THE ONLINE FILING SYSTEM.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 7-90-314, amend
(1)(b), (1)(c), (3)(a), (4)(a), (4)(f), and (5); repeal (4)(e); and add (1)(d),
(4)(g)(VIII), and (4)(g)(IX) as follows:
7-90-314. Fraudulent filings - complaint - review - referral to
attorney general - referral to administrative law judge - marking filing
as fraudulent - deceptive trade practice - definition.
(1) Fraudulent filings. The following actions are prohibited:
(b) Including an address in a document filed in the secretary of
state's office under this part 3 without the consent of the owner of or
occupant of the included address; and
(c) Delivering a document regarding an entity to the secretary of
state's office if the individual who makes the delivery lacks the necessary
written consent or authority to do so; AND
(d) USING A FRAUDULENT ENTITY, INCLUDING AN ENTITY THAT IS
HELD TO BE FRAUDULENT UNDER SUBSECTION (4)(g)(V) OF THIS SECTION, AS
A REGISTERED AGENT.
(3) Review - secretary of state.
(a) Upon receipt of a complaint submitted pursuant to subsection (2)
of this section, the secretary of state shall review the complaint and evaluate
whether the complaint indicates a violation of subsection (1) of this section
and satisfies the requirements of subsection (2) of this section. If so, the
secretary of state, using electronic means: shall:
(I) SHALL refer the complaint to the attorney general for review and
investigation under the "Colorado Consumer Protection Act", article 1 of
title 6; AND
(II) MAY MARK THE BUSINESS RECORD WITH A NOTICE THAT THE
ENTITY HAS RECEIVED A COMPLAINT OR IS UNDER INVESTIGATION.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1088

(4) Review - attorney general - hearing and findings -
administrative law judge - definition.
(a) Upon receipt of a complaint referred by the secretary of state in
accordance with subsection (3)(a) of this section, the attorney general shall
review the complaint and determine whether the complaint should be
investigated. If the attorney general determines that the complaint should be
investigated, the attorney general:
(I) Shall mail a written notice and demand to the street address or
mailing address, if different from the street address, as well as to the email
address, if available, of the registered agent of record listed in the secretary
of state's online filing system for the entity at issue; EXCEPT THAT, IF THE
ADDRESS OF THE REGISTERED AGENT IS THE SAME AS THE ADDRESS OF THE
COMPLAINANT, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO
ANY OTHER POINT OF CONTACT THAT THE ATTORNEY GENERAL DETERMINES
THROUGH INVESTIGATION TO BE A MEANS TO REACH THE ENTITY AT ISSUE;
(I.5) and, if a telephone number is available, the attorney general
shall MAY contact the registered agent by telephone IF A TELEPHONE
NUMBER IS AVAILABLE; and
(II) May provide written or verbal notice and demand to any other
point of contact that the attorney general determines through investigation
to be a means by which to reach the entity at issue.
(e) If, within twenty-one days after mailing a notice and demand, the
attorney general does not receive a response in writing or otherwise, the
attorney general shall send a second notice and demand, consistent with the
requirements of this subsection (4), and allow twenty-one days for a
response, which must comply with subsection (4)(c) of this section.
(f) (I) If the attorney general does not receive a response within
twenty-one days after mailing a second notice and demand as described in
subsection (4)(e) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (4)(c) of this section,
each allegation in the notice and demand is deemed conceded by the person
that did not respond, and the attorney general may certify that fact to the
secretary of state. Upon receiving the certification, the secretary of state
shall take the appropriate remedial action under subsections (4)(g)(V) and
(4)(g)(VI) of this section based on the conceded notice and demand.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1088

(II) As used in this subsection (4)(f), "conceded notice and demand"
means a notice and demand described in subsection (4)(e) SUBSECTION
(4)(c) of this section sent by the attorney general to which the attorney
general did not receive a response and in which, pursuant to subsection
(4)(f)(I) of this section, each allegation is deemed conceded by the person
that did not respond.
(g) (VIII) IN THE SITUATION DESCRIBED IN THE INTRODUCTORY
PORTION OF SUBSECTION (4)(g)(V) OF THIS SECTION, THE SECRETARY OF
STATE MAY TAKE ANY OF THE ACTIONS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTIONS
(4)(g)(V)(A) TO (4)(g)(V)(C) OF THIS SECTION AGAINST ANY OTHER ENTITY
THAT USES AN ENTITY AS THE REGISTERED AGENT THAT HAS BEEN
CONCEDED OR HAS BEEN FOUND TO BE FRAUDULENT OR UNAUTHORIZED AS
THE REGISTERED AGENT.
(IX) IF A DOCUMENT SUBMITTED TO THE SECRETARY OF STATE FOR
FILING INCLUDES A REFERENCE TO THE SECRETARY OF STATE, THE
SECRETARY OF STATE'S ADDRESS OR VARIATIONS OF EITHER THE NAME OR
ADDRESS, THE SECRETARY OF STATE MAY, WITHOUT THE NEED FOR A FILED
COMPLAINT, TAKE ANY OF THE ACTIONS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTIONS
(4)(g)(V)(A) TO (4)(g)(V)(C) OF THIS SECTION CONCERNING THE ENTITY OR
FILING.
(5) Enforcement - deceptive trade practice - private right of
action.
(a) A violation of subsection (1) of this section is a deceptive trade
practice under section 6-1-105 (1)(ppp) and is subject to enforcement by the
department of law in addition to the enforcement described in this section.
A determination by the administrative law judge as provided by subsection
(4)(g)(IV) of this section or a failure to timely respond to a notice and
demand as provided by subsection (4)(f) of this section constitutes a prima
facie showing that subsection (1) of this section was violated.
(b) A PERSON THAT IS INJURED BY AN ENTITY THAT HAS VIOLATED
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION MAY BRING AN ACTION TO DISSOLVE THE
ENTITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH PART 7 OF ARTICLE 56 OF THIS TITLE 7, PART
8 OF ARTICLE 80 OF THIS TITLE 7, PART 3 OF ARTICLE 114 OF THIS TITLE 7,
PART 3 OF ARTICLE 134 OF THIS TITLE 7, OR THE COMMON LAW OF
COLORADO, AS APPLICABLE. THE COURT MAY DISSOLVE THE ENTITY IF THE
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1088

COURT FINDS THAT:
(I) THE ENTITY OBTAINED ITS ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION OR
ORGANIZATION THROUGH FRAUD; OR
(II) THE ENTITY HAS CONTINUED TO EXCEED OR ABUSE THE
AUTHORITY CONFERRED UPON IT BY LAW.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 7-56-715, amend (1)
as follows:
7-56-715. Procedure for judicial dissolution.
(1) (a) A proceeding to dissolve a cooperative brought by the
attorney general shall MUST be brought:
(I) In the district court for the county in this state in which the street
address of the cooperative's principal office is located; or,
(II) If the cooperative has no principal office in this state, in the
district court for the county in which the street address of its registered
agent is located; or,
(III) If the cooperative has no registered agent, in the district court
for the city and county of Denver; OR
(IV) IF THE DISSOLUTION IS BASED ON A FRAUDULENT FILING WITH
THE SECRETARY OF STATE, IN THE DISTRICT COURT FOR THE CITY AND
COUNTY OF DENVER.
(b) IF SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY, a
proceeding brought by any other party named in section 7-56-714 shall
MUST be brought:
(I) In the district court for the county in this state in which the street
address of the cooperative's principal office is located; or,
(II) If the cooperative has no principal office in this state, in the
district court for the county in which the street address of its registered
agent is located; or
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1088

(III) If the cooperative has no registered agent, in the district court
for the city and county of Denver.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 7-80-811, amend (1)
as follows:
7-80-811. Procedure for judicial dissolution.
(1) (a) A judicial proceeding by the attorney general to dissolve a
limited liability company shall MUST be brought:
(I) In the district court for the county in this state in which the street
address of the limited liability company's principal office or the street
address of its registered agent is located; or,
(II) If the limited liability company has no principal office in this
state and no registered agent, in the district court for the city and county of
Denver; OR
(III) IF THE DISSOLUTION IS BASED ON A FRAUDULENT FILING WITH
THE SECRETARY OF STATE, IN THE DISTRICT COURT FOR THE CITY AND
COUNTY OF DENVER.
(b) IF SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY, a
judicial proceeding brought by any other A party named in section 7-80-810
to dissolve a limited liability company shall MUST be brought:
(I) In the district court for the county in this state in which the street
address of the limited liability company's principal office is located; or,
(II) If it THE LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY has no principal office in
this state, in the district court for the county in which the street address of
its registered agent is located; or
(III) If the limited liability company has no registered agent, in the
district court for the city and county of Denver.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 7-90-402, add (6) as
follows:
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1088

7-90-402. Interrogatories by secretary of state - fraudulent
business records.
(6) (a) IF THE SECRETARY OF STATE HAS A REASONABLE BASIS TO
BELIEVE THAT A RECORD IS FRAUDULENT OR UNAUTHORIZED BASED ON THE
RESPONSE OR FAILURE TO RESPOND TO AN INTERROGATORY, THE SECRETARY
OF STATE MAY:
(I) MARK THE RECORD WITH A NOTICE THAT THE RECORD IS
UNAUTHORIZED OR FRAUDULENT AND DECLARE THE ENTITY DELINQUENT
PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 7-90-901 AND 7-90-902;
(II) REDACT THE UNAUTHORIZED ADDRESS OR NAME FROM THE
RECORD AND FROM ANY OTHER RELEVANT RECORDS;
(III) DISABLE ADDITIONAL FILING FUNCTIONALITY ON THE ENTITY'S
RECORDS; AND
(IV) TAKE ACTIONS AUTHORIZED IN SECTION 7-90-314 (4)(g)(VIII).
(b) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, "REASONABLE BASIS" MEANS THE
SECRETARY OF STATE HAS INFORMATION REASONABLY DEMONSTRATING
THAT A FILING HAS VIOLATED SECTION 7-90-314 (1). THIS INFORMATION
INCLUDES A RECORD HAVING THE FOLLOWING WITH RESPECT TO A RECORD
DETERMINED TO BE FRAUDULENT OR UNAUTHORIZED UNDER SECTION
7-90-314:
(I) A MATCH OR CLOSE SIMILARITY IN AN ENTITY OR CONTACT NAME
OR ADDRESS WITH THE FRAUDULENT OR UNAUTHORIZED RECORD;
(II) PATTERNS OF ACTIVITY CONSISTENT WITH THE FRAUDULENT OR
UNAUTHORIZED RECORD; OR
(III) ELECTRONIC IDENTIFIERS ASSOCIATED WITH THE FRAUDULENT
OR UNAUTHORIZED RECORD.
(c) A PERSON AGGRIEVED BY AN ACTION TAKEN BY THE SECRETARY
OF STATE UNDER SUBSECTION (6)(a) OF THIS SECTION MAY REQUEST THE
SECRETARY OF STATE TO REVERSE THE ACTIONS TAKEN. THE REQUEST MUST
BE SUBMITTED IN A FORM PRESCRIBED BY THE SECRETARY OF STATE AND
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1088

INCLUDE EVIDENCE SHOWING THAT THE ACTION WAS AN ERROR. IF THE
SECRETARY OF STATE DENIES THE REQUEST, THE AGGRIEVED PERSON MAY
SEEK JUDICIAL REVIEW BY BRINGING AN ACTION IN THE DISTRICT COURT IN
AND FOR THE CITY AND COUNTY OF DENVER.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 7-114-302, amend (1)
as follows:
7-114-302. Procedure for judicial dissolution.
(1) (a) A proceeding by the attorney general to dissolve a
corporation shall MUST be brought:
(I) In the district court for the county in this state in which the street
address of the corporation's principal office or the street address of its
registered agent is located; or,
(II) If the corporation has no principal office in this state and no
registered agent, in the district court for the city and county of Denver; OR
(III) IF THE DISSOLUTION IS BASED ON A FRAUDULENT FILING WITH
THE SECRETARY OF STATE, IN THE DISTRICT COURT FOR THE CITY AND
COUNTY OF DENVER.
(b) IF SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY, a
proceeding brought by any other A party named in section 7-114-301 shall
MUST be brought:
(I) In the district court for the county in this state in which the street
address of the corporation's principal office is located; or,
(II) If it THE CORPORATION has no principal office in this state, in the
district court for the county in which the street address of its registered
agent is located; or
(III) If the corporation has no registered agent, in the district court
for the city and county of Denver.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 7-134-302, amend (1)
as follows:
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1088

7-134-302. Procedure for judicial dissolution.
(1) (a) A proceeding by the attorney general to dissolve a nonprofit
corporation shall MUST be brought:
(I) In the district court for the county in this state in which the street
address of the nonprofit corporation's principal office or the street address
of its registered agent is located; or,
(II) If the nonprofit corporation has no principal office in this state
and no registered agent, in the district court for the city and county of
Denver; OR
(III) IF THE DISSOLUTION IS BASED ON A FRAUDULENT FILING WITH
THE SECRETARY OF STATE, IN THE DISTRICT COURT FOR THE CITY AND
COUNTY OF DENVER.
(b) IF SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY, a
proceeding brought by any other party named in section 7-134-301 shall
MUST be brought:
(I) In the district court for the county in this state in which the street
address of the nonprofit corporation's principal office is located; or,
(II) If it THE NONPROFIT CORPORATION has no principal office in this
state, in the district court for the county in which the street address of its
registered agent is located; or
(III) If the nonprofit corporation has no registered agent, in the
district court for the city and county of Denver.
SECTION 8. Appropriation. (1) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year,
$193,954 is appropriated to the department of state. This appropriation is
from the department of state cash fund created in section 24-21-104 (3)(b),
C.R.S. To implement this act, the department may use this appropriation as
follows:
(a) $37,860 for use by the business and licensing division for
personal services, which amount is based on an assumption that the division
will require an additional 0.8 FTE;
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1088

(b) $5,400 for use by the business and licensing division for
operating expenses;
(c) $147,686 for use by the information technology division for
personal services, which amount is based on an assumption that the division
will require an additional 0.3 FTE; and
(d) $3,008 for use by the information technology division for
operating expenses.
SECTION 9. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3)
of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or
part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will
not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be
held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1088

(2) This act applies to complaints filed on or after the applicable
effective date of this act.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1088